Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-310. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 6; 1981, No. 741, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 41.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1991, No. 867, § 1, provided:

“The Governor may, by executive order, transfer the State Employees Insurance Section of the Department of Finance and Administration to the State Insurance Department at such time as he determines it to be in the best interest of the State Employees Insurance Program.”

Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9, provided:

“The State Employees Insurance Advisory Committee created by Arkansas Code 21-5-401 is abolished effective July 1, 1995. Arkansas Code 21-5-402, 21-5-403, 21-5-404, 21-5-405, 21-5-406, 21-5-407, 21-5-408, 21-5-409 are repealed. All rights, powers and duties of that Committee are transferred to the board created under the provisions of this act. The Public School Insurance Advisory Committee created by Arkansas Code 6-17-1102 is abolished effective July 1, 1995. Arkansas Code 6-17-1101, 6-17-1103, 6-17-1104, 6-17-1105, 6-17-1106, 6-17-1107, 6-17-1108 and 6-17-1110 are repealed. All rights, powers and duties of that Committee are transferred to the board created under the provisions of this act. Any funding or contracts now in force or authorized by the 1995 Regular Session of the General Assembly shall be carried forward to the Arkansas State Employees/Public School Personnel Board until the expiration of the contracts.”

Acts 2011, No. 855, § 1, provided:

“Legislative Findings.

“The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Morbid obesity causes many medical problems and costly health complications, such as diabetes, hypertension, heart disease, and stroke;

“(2)The cost of managing the complications of morbid obesity, largely due to inadequate treatment, far outweighs the cost of expeditious, effective medical treatment;

“(3)Guidelines developed by the National Institutes of Health, the American Society for Bariatric Surgery, the American Obesity Association, and Shape Up America and embraced by the American Medical Association and the American College of Surgeons recommend that patients who are morbidly obese receive responsible, affordable medical treatment for their obesity; and

“(4)The diagnosis and treatment of morbid obesity should be a clinical decision made by a physician based on evidence-based guidelines.”

Acts 2011, No. 855, § 2, provided:

“Definitions. As used in this subchapter:

“(1)‘Body mass index’ means body weight in kilograms divided by height in meters squared; and

“(2)(A)‘Morbid obesity’ means a weight that is at least two (2) times the ideal weight for frame, age, height, and gender of an individual as determined by an examining physician.

“(B)Morbid obesity may be measured as a body mass index:

“(i)Equal to or greater than thirty-five kilograms per meter squared (35 kg/m2) with comorbidity or coexisting medical conditions such as hypertension, cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea, or diabetes; or

“(ii)Greater than forty (40) kilograms per meter squared (40 kg/m2).”

Acts 2011, No. 855, § 3, as amended by identical Acts 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 3 and 6, §10, and as amended by Acts 2017, No. 927, §1, provided:

“Pilot Program on coverage for morbid obesity diagnosis and treatment.

“(a)(1)(A)A state and public school employees health benefit plan that is offered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2012, shall offer coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of morbid obesity.

“(B)The cost of coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of morbid obesity offered under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall not exceed:

“(i)Three million dollars ($3,000,000) annually for the Arkansas State Employees Health Benefit Plan; or

“(ii)Three million dollars ($3,000,000) annually for the Arkansas Public school Employees Health Benefit Plan.

“(2)The coverage for morbid obesity offered under subdivision (a)(1) of this section includes without limitation coverage for bariatric surgery including:

“(A)Gastric bypass surgery;

“(B)Adjustable gastric banding surgery;

“(C)Sleeve gastrectomy surgery; and

“(D)Duodenal switch biliopancreatic diversion.

“(b)The coverage for morbid obesity diagnosis and treatment offered under this section does not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable under a state and public school employees health benefit plan.

“(c)The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may discontinue or suspend a plan option offered under subsection (a) of this section if the board determines adjustments are necessary to ensure the financial soundness and overall well-being of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program.”

Acts 2011, No. 855, § 4, provided: “Rules. The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board shall adopt rules to implement this subchapter.”

Acts 2011, No. 855, § 5, as amended by Acts 2017, No. 927, §2, provided: “This act shall become null and void and cease to have any effect on and after midnight on December 31, 2021.”

Identical Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 3 and 6, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)The health insurance program provided by the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board for public school employees and public school employee retirees is in a state of crisis;

“(2)Since 2005 the General Assembly has authorized supplemental funding for the Department of Education to send to the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration for the purpose of offsetting premium increases for public school employees without implementing long term systemic and structural reforms;

“(3)In addition to the need for short-term action by the General Assembly to avert the impending premium increases for public school employees and public school employees, the General Assembly must take an active role in crafting a long-term solution to ensure the stability of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program;

“(4)The composition of the board should be diverse and reflect the racial, ethnic, and gender demographics of the state to ensure that multiple viewpoints are involved in board actions that impact state employees, state employee retirees, public school employees, and public school employee retirees;

“(5)The board has failed to fulfill their mission and provide a stable and actuarially sound system of health insurance benefits for public school employees by:

“(A)Failing to make the adjustments necessary to health plan options for public school employees that would prevent significant premium increases, resulting in burdensome costs to both public school employees and taxpayers; and

“(B)Refusing to acknowledge that parity between insurance programs for state employees and public school employees is a goal, not a mandate, resulting in unnecessary costs to both public school employees and taxpayers and exacerbating the instability of the program; and

“(6)The failure of the board has resulted in the need for the General Assembly to inject additional money into the program to maintain the integrity of the program by offsetting premium increases for public school employees, which allowed the program to maintain participation levels.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that:

“(1)Any additional funding provided for public school employee health insurance during this special session be considered a one-time infusion of money, not a permanent funding source;

“(2)Funding will revert to the current level unless there is meaningful reform and restructuring of the program that restores permanent stability and actuarial soundness;

“(3)The General Assembly, through the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program Legislative Task Force, study, develop, and recommend fundamental restructuring of the program, including without limitation the:

“(A)Governance of the program;

“(B)Management of the program; and

“(C)Goals of the program; and

“(4)While the task force is conducting the study, the General Assembly, through the Joint Performance Review Committee, the Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the House Committee on Revenue and Taxation, shall continue to provide oversight of the board, including without limitation board activities and decisions.”

Identical Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 3 and 6, § 3, as amended by Acts 2015, No. 912, §2, and as amended by identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 91, provided: “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program Legislative Task Force — Creation — Membership — Duties.

“(a)There is created the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program Legislative Task Force.

“(b)(1)The task force shall consist of the following twelve (12) members:

“(A)The Chair of the House Committee on Education or the chair's designee;

“(B)The Chair of the Senate Committee on Education or the chair's designee;

“(C)The Chair of the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce or the chair's designee;

“(D)The Chair of the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce or the chair's designee;

“(E)Four (4) senators appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

“(F)Four (4) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(2)If a vacancy occurs on the task force, the vacancy shall be filled by the same process as the original appointment.

“(3)Legislative members of the task force shall be paid per diem and mileage as authorized by law for attendance at meetings of interim committees of the General Assembly.

“(c)(1)The Chair of the Senate Committee on Education or the chair's designee shall call the first meeting of the task force within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act and shall serve as chair of the task force at the first meeting.

“(2)At the first meeting of the task force, the members of the task force shall elect from its membership a chair and other officers as needed for the transaction of its business.

“(3)(A)The task force shall conduct its meetings in Pulaski County at the State Capitol Building or another site with teleconferencing capabilities.

“(B)Meetings of the task force shall be held at least one (1) time every two (2) months but may occur more often at the call of the chair.

“(4)The task force shall establish rules and procedures for conducting its business.

“(5)(A)A majority of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum for transacting business of the task force.

“(B)No action may be taken by the task force except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

“(6)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall provide staff for the task force.

“(d)The purpose of the task force is to:

“(1)Develop an implementation plan for the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program that will allow the program to operate on an actuarially sound basis while ensuring a high-quality, low-cost program of insurance for state employees, state employee retirees, public school employees, and public school employee retirees;

“(2)Increase public awareness and transparency of the:

“(A)Program, including plan options available under the program; and

“(B)Governance and operation of the program; and

“(3)Develop a legislative framework that will promote the actuarial soundness and stability of the program.

“(e)To meet the goals of the task force, the task force shall:

“(1)Study all aspects of the state and public school life and health insurance program for the purpose of recommending changes that will ensure the financial stability of the program while offering participants affordable healthcare coverage, including without limitation:

“(A)Researching current insurance concepts, market conditions, regulatory issues, the effects of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148, and best practices from other states;

“(B)Exploring:

“(i)Cost-containment measures and funding options for plan options offered under the program;

“(ii)Ways to promote competition among vendors and the offering of competitive health insurance plan options that include quality-of-care delivery, portability, and accessible and affordable health care; and

“(iii)The role that the current structure of the program, and plan options under the program, have historically contributed to the volatility of the system;

“(C)Reviewing state statutes that may be barriers to the overall actuarial soundness and stability of the program;

“(D)Preparing a comprehensive analysis of recommended health insurance plan options to be offered under the program; and

“(E)Evaluating the governance and structure of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board;

“(2)If the task force determines necessary, contract with consultants to assist the task force with the study;

“(3)On or before June 30, 2014, file with the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate a written, preliminary report of the task force's activities, findings, and recommendations; and

“(4)On or before June 29, 2015, file with the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate a written, final report of the task force's activities, findings, and recommendations.

“(f)The task force expires December 31, 2018.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Cross References. Damages adjudged against state officers and employees, payment by state, §21-9-201 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 1977, No. 389, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the General Assembly hereby finds and recognizes that there has been a dramatic increase in the medical care cost in the past few years and that this cost will continue to rise at the rate of approximately twenty percent (20%) a year for the next two years; and

“Whereas, the State Employees Insurance Committee will make a concerted effort to maintain the current cost to the State employees; and

“Whereas, the proposed legislation will provide a twenty percent (20%) increase in the State's contribution for each year of the 1977-1979 biennium; and

“Whereas, the increased contribution will not be used unless it becomes necessary to keep the plan sound;

“Now, therefore….

Acts 1979, No. 323, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the General Assembly hereby finds and recognizes that there has been a dramatic increase in the medical care cost in the past few years and that this cost will continue to rise at the rate of approximately twenty percent (20%) a year for the next two years; and

“Whereas, the State Employees Insurance Committee will make a concerted effort to maintain the current cost to the State employees; and

“Whereas, the proposed legislation will provide a twenty percent (20%) increase in the State's contribution for each year of the 1979-1981 biennium; and

“Whereas, the increased contribution will not be used unless it becomes necessary to keep the plan sound;

“Now, therefore….”

Acts 1981, No. 838, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the General Assembly hereby finds and recognizes that there has been a dramatic increase in the medical care cost in the past few years and that this cost will continue to rise at the rate of approximately twenty percent (20%) a year for the next two years; and

“Whereas, the State Employees Insurance Committee will make a concerted effort to maintain the current cost to the State employees; and

“Whereas, the proposed legislation will provide a twenty percent (20%) increase in the State's contribution for each year of 1981-1983 biennium; and

“Whereas, the increased contribution will not be used unless it becomes necessary to keep the plan sound;

“Now, therefore….”

Acts 1983, No. 469, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the General Assembly hereby finds and recognizes that there has been a dramatic increase in the cost of medical care in the past few years and that this cost will continue to rise for the next two years; and

“Whereas, the State Employees Insurance Advisory Committee will make a concerted effort to maintain the current cost to the State employees; and

“Whereas, the proposed legislation will provide an increase in the State's contribution for each year of 1983-1985 biennium; and

“Whereas, the increased contribution will not be used unless it becomes necessary to keep the plan sound;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 17: Feb. 18, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Sixty-Eighth General Assembly, meeting in Extraordinary Session that the State of Arkansas does not have a life and/or disability insurance program for the State Employees, and that a program of this nature would greatly enhance the morale and well-being of the employees of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 72, §§ 2, 4: July 1, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under Amendment No. 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, acts without an emergency clause become effective 90 days after final adjournment of the General Assembly; that due to the unusually heavy workload of the Sixty-Ninth General Assembly it may be necessary to extend the Session, as authorized in Article 5, Section 17 of the Constitution and that an extension of the Session might result in this Act not becoming effective until after July 1, 1973 unless an emergency is declared; and that it is essential that this Act go into effect on July 1, 1973. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 842, § 4: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that a change in the administrative organization of the State Employees Insurance Section is necessary to secure the more efficient functioning of the said Section. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the public health, welfare, and safety, shall be effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 156, § 2: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential that the State of Arkansas offer and provide insurance programs that will effectively serve the needs of state employees; that such insurance programs are of great assistance in recruiting permanent personnel for the various state agencies; that under Amendment No. 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, acts without an emergency clause become effective 90 days after final adjournment of the General Assembly; that it may be necessary to extend the Session, as authorized in Article 5, Section 17 of the Constitution and that an extension of the Session might result in this Act not becoming effective until after July 1, 1975, unless an emergency is declared; and that it is essential that this Act go into effect on July 1, 1975. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1975, No. 575, § 4: Mar. 27, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is urgent need to clarify the present law relating to the membership of the State Employees Insurance Advisory Committee; that under the present State Employees Group Insurance Law the Administrative personnel of the State Police Retirement, and Members of the Teacher Retirement System who have retired or who hereafter retire and draw benefits under said systems are not eligible to participate in the State Employees Group Insurance Plan and that the law should be revised to permit participation by such retired employees at the earliest possible date; and that this Act is designed to accomplish these worthwhile purposes and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 389, § 3: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential that the State of Arkansas offer and provide insurance programs that will effectively serve the needs of State employees; that such insurance programs are of great assistance in recruiting permanent personnel for the various State agencies; that under Amendment No. 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, acts without an emergency clause become effective 90 days after final adjournment of the General Assembly; that it may be necessary to extend the Session, as authorized in Article 5, Section 17 of the Constitution and that an extension of the Session might result in this Act not becoming effective until after July 1, 1977, unless an emergency is declared; and that it is essential that this Act go into effect on July 1, 1977. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1979, No. 323, § 3: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential that the State of Arkansas offer and provide insurance programs that will effectively serve the needs of State employees; that such insurance programs are of great assistance in recruiting permanent personnel for the various State agencies; that under Amendment No. 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, acts without an emergency clause become effective 90 days after final adjournment of the General Assembly; that it may be necessary to extend the Session, as authorized in Article 5, Section 17 of the Constitution and that an extension of the Session might result in this Act not becoming effective until after July 1, 1979, unless an emergency is declared; and that it is essential that this Act go into effect on July 1, 1979. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 749, § 9: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly, that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to prevent irreparable harm to the proper administration and provision of essential government programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 838, § 10: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential that the State of Arkansas offer and provide insurance programs that will effectively serve the needs of State employees; that such insurance programs are of great assistance in recruiting permanent personnel for the various State agencies; that under Amendment No. 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, acts without an emergency clause become effective 90 days after final adjournment of the General Assembly; that it may be necessary to extend the Session, as authorized in Article 5, Section 17 of the Constitution and that an extension of the Session might result in this Act not becoming effective until after July 1, 1981, unless an emergency is declared; and that it is essential that this Act go into effect on July 1, 1981. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 423, § 7: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to prevent irreparable harm to the proper administration and provision of essential government programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 469, § 3: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential that the State of Arkansas offer and provide insurance programs that will effectively serve the needs of State employees; that such insurance programs are of great assistance in recruiting permanent personnel for the various State agencies; that under Amendment No. 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, acts without an emergency clause become effective 90 days after final adjournment of the General Assembly; that it may be necessary to extend the Session, as authorized in Article 5, Section 17 of the Constitution and that an extension of the Session might result in this Act not becoming effective until after July 1, 1983, unless an emergency is declared; and that it is essential that this Act go into effect on July 1, 1983. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 582, § 3: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly that it is essential to the administration of the State Employees Insurance Program that premiums and reports be received when due from State Agencies. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 4: June 26, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present laws relating to State Group Health Insurance does not specifically authorize retired instructors and administrative staff of vocational-technical schools and retired members of the Vocational-Technical Division to participate in the State group health insurance plan; that this oversight should be corrected immediately in order to avoid hardship and inequity to such personnel; that this Act is designed to correct this undesirable situation and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 711, § 3: Mar. 20, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current prohibition against an agency continuing contributions to health insurance programs for employees who are leave with pay because of a work related injury is creating a severe financial hardship for employees who have been injured on the job. Therefore, in order to address this serious problem, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 127, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law establishing the amount of contribution made by the State to help defray the cost of state employee's life and health insurance expires on June 30, 1991; that this Act establishes the contribution level to begin upon the expiration of the current law; and that this Act should therefore go into effect on July 1, 1991. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 904, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the State Employees Insurance Plan and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration of this essential governmental program. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 580, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this act increases the state's contribution to the State Employees Insurance Plan; that this act should go into effect on the first day of the next fiscal year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted this act will not go in effect until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 14: Apr. 11, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the effective and efficient management of the state employee and the public school personnel health insurance programs that a single board be established to administer the programs and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect on a specific date in order to assure a smooth transition to the single board concept. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 183, § 8: Feb. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Insurance and Commerce and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Insurance and Commerce; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Insurance and Commerce and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Insurance and Commerce; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governer and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 843, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that appropriate health care insurance coverage and benefits be provided state employees and that it is essential to the effective and efficient management of the state employee and public school personnel health insurance program that maximum monthly contributions by the State of Arkansas for life and health insurance premiums are authorized for the next and subsequent bienniums. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1280, § 19: Apr. 9, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that provisions contained in this bill be enacted into law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1171, § 2: Mar. 28, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Plan does not provide retirees on other health insurance plans with the option to return to coverage under the state's plan after retirement; that providing this option to state employees and state retirees will provide extra motivation and work incentives for Arkansas public employees; that providing this option will not cost the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Plan since there are no associated employer costs with this coverage; and that providing this option is immediately needed for retirees who may suffer financially if insurance coverage is not extended. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1752, § 3: Apr. 18, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that a person retiring from certain institutions of higher education during 2001 will experience uncertainty regarding their eligibility for group health insurance coverage; that providing immediate eligibility for health insurance benefits to those retirees is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effetive on the date the last house overrides the veto.”
